Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1014.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1314-A. Bell-to-bell phone-free policy.--(a) No later than the start of the 2027-2028 school year, the governing body of each school entity shall adopt a policy related to student possession and use of mobile devices during the school day while on school property.(b) (1) Except as provided under subsection (c), consistent <--1234567891011121314151617 with the provisions of this section, the governing body of a school entity shall adopt a policy relating to mobile devices and shall:(i) prohibit the use of a mobile device during the school day while on school property; and(ii) establish the manner in which a student's possession of a mobile device is to be restricted during the school day while on school property.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school entity to take possession of a student's mobile device. If the governing body of a school entity adopts a policy that permits an employe of a school entity to take possession of a student's mobile device, the school entity or school employe shall not be liable for any damaged or lost mobile device if the school employe acted in good faith to secure the mobile device in accordance with the school entity's policy.(3) The policy shall include appropriate enforcement and oversight provisions to ensure compliance at a school building.(4) At the beginning of each school year and upon enrollment, each school entity shall provide written notification to parents and legal guardians of students enrolled in the school entity of the methods for a parent or legal guardian to contact their child during the school day and information on how to sign up for emergency notifications. Methods for a parent or legal guardian to contact their child during the school day may include, but not be limited to, the school building phone number or an electronic mail address. The school entity shall ensure that any method of contact provided to parents and legal guardians under this paragraph is staffed during the school day.20250SB1014PN1697 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) A school entity's policy shall include exceptions to allow limited use of a mobile device during the school day by a student who:(1) Requires a mobile device due to a student's medical condition, documented by a medical provider.(2) Has an individualized education program or 504 service agreement in which a mobile device is part of the accommodations or services provided to the student.(3) Is an English learner and uses a mobile device for translation or other English as a second language purposes.(4) Is instructed to do so by a teacher as an instructional tool with the approval of a school building principal, provided that:(i) a school-issued device is insufficient or unavailable for the instructional purposes needed by the teacher;(ii) the principal determines that the use of the mobile device is necessary for instructional purposes; and(iii) the approval is for a limited circumstance and duration and does not permit the use of a mobile device as a regular part of instruction.(d) A school entity's policy may allow a chief school administrator or a designee to approve an exception not authorized under subsection (c) if the request for the exception is made by a principal of a school building. The following shall apply to the requested exception:(1) The principal must submit a written request for the exception to the chief school administrator or a designee. The request shall include the following:(i) The purpose of the exception.(ii) The date, time and duration of the exception.20250SB1014PN1697 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A description of to whom the exception shall apply.(2) The exception requested may not exceed one school day.(3) The request shall be submitted prior to the school day on which the exception is to occur.(4) The chief school administrator or a designee may approve or deny a principal's request.(e) Prior to the adoption by the governing body of a school entity's policy or amending an existing policy, the governing body of the school entity shall:(1) ensure the opportunity for public comment, including feedback from:(i) parents or legal guardians of students attending the school entity;(ii) employes and any employe organization representing employes of the school entity; and(iii) students attending the school entity; and(2) be encouraged to engage students, parents, legal guardians, employes, employe organizations and members of the community in a stakeholder process through which the governing body of the school entity may obtain input that the governing body may incorporate into the school entity's policy.(f) The governing body of a school entity that adopted a policy relating to mobile devices prior to the effective date of this section shall, no later than the start of the 2027-2028 school year, amend the existing policy, if needed, to comply with the requirements of this section.(g) (1) Each school entity shall post the school entity's policy on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website no later than five (5) business days after adoption. If a school entity amends the policy after adoption, the amended 20250SB1014PN1697 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 policy shall be posted on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website within five (5) business days.(2) No later than five (5) business days after posting a copy of the policy or amended policy as required under paragraph (1), a school entity shall submit documentation to the department verifying that a copy of the school entity's policy or amended policy is posted on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website.(h) As used in this section:"504 service agreement" shall have the meaning as defined in section 1331.1(e)."Chief school administrator" shall mean the:(1) superintendent of a school district;(2) executive director of an intermediate school; or(3) chief executive of a charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or multiple charter school organization."Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Employe organization" shall have the meaning given to it in section 1101-A."Individualized education program" shall mean an individualized education program developed in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 14.131 (relating to IEP) and the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.)."Mobile device" shall mean a personal mobile telephone or other portable electronic device capable of connecting to the Internet and enabling the user to access content on the Internet, that is not owned by a school entity or issued by a 20250SB1014PN1697 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school entity to a student. A mobile device shall include a device with which a user could engage in a call; write, send or receive a message; send or receive data or an image; record, play or edit audio or video data; play a game; or watch a video. The term does not include a portable device which meets the definition of a medical device under 21 U.S.C. § 321 (relating to definitions generally)."Policy" shall mean a policy adopted by the governing body of a school entity under subsection (a) or amended under subsection (e) related to student possession and use of mobile devices during the school day while on school property."Principal" shall mean a building principal, an assistant principal, a vice principal, a supervisor of special education or a director of career and technical education."School day" shall mean the entirety of every instructional day during all instructional and non-instructional time, as determined by the governing body of the school entity, including homeroom periods, lunch, recess and the time moving between classes."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school operating in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.AMENDING THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), ENTITLED "AN ACT RELATING TO THE PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM, INCLUDING CERTAIN PROVISIONS APPLICABLE AS WELL TO PRIVATE AND PAROCHIAL SCHOOLS; AMENDING, REVISING, CONSOLIDATING AND CHANGING THE LAWS RELATING THERETO," IN STUDENT SUPPORTS, PROVIDING FOR BELL-TO-BELL MOBILE DEVICE POLICY.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN 20250SB1014PN1697 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1314-A. BELL-TO-BELL MOBILE DEVICE POLICY.--(A) NO LATER THAN THE START OF THE 2027-2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ADOPT A POLICY RELATED TO STUDENT POSSESSION AND USE OF MOBILE DEVICES DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY.(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C), CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ADOPT A POLICY RELATING TO MOBILE DEVICES AND SHALL:(I) PROHIBIT THE USE OF A MOBILE DEVICE DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY; AND(II) ESTABLISH THE MANNER IN WHICH A STUDENT'S POSSESSION OF A MOBILE DEVICE IS TO BE RESTRICTED DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A SCHOOL ENTITY TO TAKE POSSESSION OF A STUDENT'S MOBILE DEVICE. IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY ADOPTS A POLICY THAT PERMITS AN EMPLOYE OF A SCHOOL ENTITY TO TAKE POSSESSION OF A STUDENT'S MOBILE DEVICE, THE SCHOOL ENTITY OR SCHOOL EMPLOYE SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGED OR LOST MOBILE DEVICE IF THE SCHOOL EMPLOYE ACTED IN GOOD FAITH TO SECURE THE MOBILE DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY.(3) THE POLICY SHALL INCLUDE APPROPRIATE ENFORCEMENT AND OVERSIGHT PROVISIONS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE AT A SCHOOL BUILDING.(4) AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR AND UPON ENROLLMENT, EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL ENTITY OF THE METHODS FOR A STUDENT, PARENT OR 20250SB1014PN1697 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LEGAL GUARDIAN TO SIGN UP FOR EMERGENCY NOTIFICATIONS.(5) AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR AND UPON ENROLLMENT, EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL ENTITY OF THE METHODS TO CONTACT THEIR CHILD DURING THE SCHOOL DAY. METHODS MAY INCLUDE, BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO, THE SCHOOL BUILDING PHONE NUMBER OR AN ELECTRONIC MAIL ADDRESS. THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ENSURE THAT ANY METHOD OF CONTACT PROVIDED TO PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH IS STAFFED DURING THE SCHOOL DAY.(C) A SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY SHALL INCLUDE EXCEPTIONS TO ALLOW LIMITED USE OF A MOBILE DEVICE DURING THE SCHOOL DAY BY A STUDENT WHO:(1) REQUIRES A MOBILE DEVICE DUE TO THE MEDICAL CONDITION, DOCUMENTED BY A MEDICAL PROVIDER, OF THE STUDENT OR AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF THE STUDENT.(2) HAS AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR 504 SERVICE AGREEMENT IN WHICH A MOBILE DEVICE IS PART OF THE ACCOMMODATIONS OR SERVICES PROVIDED TO THE STUDENT.(3) IS AN ENGLISH LEARNER AND USES A MOBILE DEVICE FOR TRANSLATION OR OTHER ENGLISH AS A SECOND LANGUAGE PURPOSES.(4) HAS PERMISSION FROM A TEACHER TO USE A MOBILE DEVICE FOR EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, PROVIDED THAT:(I) A SCHOOL-ISSUED DEVICE IS INSUFFICIENT OR UNAVAILABLE FOR THE INSTRUCTIONAL PURPOSES NEEDED BY THE TEACHER;(II) THE PRINCIPAL DETERMINES THAT THE USE OF THE MOBILE DEVICE IS APPROPRIATE FOR INSTRUCTIONAL PURPOSES; AND(III) THE APPROVAL IS FOR A LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCE AND DURATION AND DOES NOT PERMIT THE USE OF A MOBILE DEVICE AS A REGULAR PART OF INSTRUCTION.20250SB1014PN1697 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) A SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY MAY ALLOW A PRINCIPAL OF A SCHOOL BUILDING TO APPROVE AN EXCEPTION NOT AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (C). THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO THE EXCEPTION:(1) THE PRINCIPAL MUST SUBMIT A NOTIFICATION FOR THE EXCEPTION TO THE CHIEF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR OR A DESIGNEE. THE NOTIFICATION SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE PURPOSE OF THE EXCEPTION.(II) THE DATE, TIME AND DURATION OF THE EXCEPTION.(III) A DESCRIPTION OF TO WHOM THE EXCEPTION SHALL APPLY.(2) THE EXCEPTION MAY NOT EXCEED ONE (1) SCHOOL DAY.(3) THE NOTIFICATION SHALL BE SUBMITTED NO LATER THAN FIVE (5) DAYS AFTER THE SCHOOL DAY ON WHICH THE EXCEPTION OCCURRED.(E) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT ADOPTED A POLICY RELATING TO MOBILE DEVICES PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL, NO LATER THAN THE START OF THE 2027-2028 SCHOOL YEAR, AMEND THE EXISTING POLICY, IF NEEDED, TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.(F) (1) AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR, A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL INFORM PARENTS, LEGAL GUARDIANS, TEACHERS AND STUDENTS OF THE POLICY ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION AND ANY CHANGES TO THE POLICY SINCE THE PREVIOUS SCHOOL YEAR, IF APPLICABLE.(2) NO LATER THAN FIVE (5) BUSINESS DAYS AFTER POSTING A COPY OF THE POLICY OR AMENDED POLICY AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT DOCUMENTATION TO THE DEPARTMENT VERIFYING THAT A COPY OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY OR AMENDED POLICY IS POSTED ON THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(G) AS USED IN THIS SECTION:"504 SERVICE AGREEMENT" SHALL HAVE THE MEANING AS DEFINED IN 20250SB1014PN1697 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 1331.1(E)."CHIEF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR" SHALL MEAN THE:(1) SUPERINTENDENT OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT;(2) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT;(3) CHIEF EXECUTIVE OF A CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL OR MULTIPLE CHARTER SCHOOL ORGANIZATION; OR(4) GOVERNING BODY, OR EQUIVALENT BODY, OF A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, PRIVATE SCHOOL OR APPROVED PUBLIC SCHOOL."DEPARTMENT" SHALL MEAN THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM" SHALL MEAN AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 22 PA. CODE § 14.131 (RELATING TO IEP) AND THE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT (PUBLIC LAW 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 ET SEQ.)."MOBILE DEVICE" SHALL MEAN A PERSONAL MOBILE TELEPHONE OR OTHER PORTABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE CAPABLE OF CONNECTING TO THE INTERNET AND ENABLING THE USER TO ACCESS CONTENT ON THE INTERNET, THAT IS NOT OWNED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY OR ISSUED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY TO A STUDENT. A MOBILE DEVICE SHALL INCLUDE A DEVICE WITH WHICH A USER COULD ENGAGE IN A CALL; WRITE, SEND OR RECEIVE A MESSAGE; SEND OR RECEIVE DATA OR AN IMAGE; RECORD, PLAY OR EDIT AUDIO OR VIDEO DATA; PLAY A GAME; OR WATCH A VIDEO. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PORTABLE DEVICE THAT MEETS THE DEFINITION OF A DEVICE UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 321 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS GENERALLY) OR A DUAL USE WATCH IF THE WATCH'S WI-FI AND DATA ARE DISABLED . "NONPUBLIC SCHOOL" SHALL HAVE THE MEANING AS DEFINED IN SECTION 923.3-A(B).20250SB1014PN1697 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "POLICY" SHALL MEAN A POLICY ADOPTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR AMENDED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) RELATED TO STUDENT POSSESSION AND USE OF MOBILE DEVICES DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY."PRINCIPAL" SHALL MEAN A BUILDING PRINCIPAL, AN ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL, A VICE PRINCIPAL, A SUPERVISOR OF SPECIAL EDUCATION OR A DIRECTOR OF CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION."SCHOOL DAY" SHALL MEAN THE ENTIRETY OF EVERY INSTRUCTIONAL DAY DURING ALL INSTRUCTIONAL AND NON-INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, AS DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY, INCLUDING HOMEROOM PERIODS, LUNCH, RECESS AND THE TIME MOVING BETWEEN CLASSES."SCHOOL ENTITY" SHALL MEAN A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL, PRIVATE SCHOOL, APPROVED PRIVATE SCHOOL, NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL OPERATING IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250SB1014PN1697 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718